Utah statutes.
32B-6-708.   Information obtained by investigator.

(1)  Subject to Subsection (2), if an investigator is permitted by another provision of this title to inspect a record of an on-premise beer retailer that is a tavern, in addition to any other rights under this title, the investigator may inspect, have a copy of, or otherwise review any record of the tavern that is a visual recording of the operations of the tavern.

(2)  An investigator who is a peace officer may not inspect, have a copy of, or otherwise review a visual recording described in Subsection (1) without probable cause.

